Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201819-4038
Districts created prior to May 23, 1979; governed by act.

Any business improvement district or any downtown improvement and parking district created prior to May 23, 1979, pursuant to sections 19-3401 to 19-3420 or 19-4001 to 19-4014, shall continue in existence and shall hereafter be governed by the Business Improvement District Act.

Laws 1979, LB 251, § 24;

Laws 2015, LB168, § 19.